New York, session 2025-2026, S1678.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 3-300 of the 2 village law and section 3 of the public officers law requiring a person 3 to be a resident of the political subdivision or municipal corporation 4 of the state for which such person shall be chosen or within which such 5 person's official functions are required to be exercised, the village 6 board of trustees of the incorporated village of East Syracuse, in the 7 county of Onondaga, is hereby authorized to provide, by resolution, that 8 the office of village justice and/or associate justice may be held by a 9 person who is not a resident of such village, provided that such person 10 resides within the town of Dewitt, in the county of Onondaga. Provided, 11 however, the person performing the functions of village justice and/or 12 associate justice in any other village shall be a resident of such 13 village, unless otherwise provided by an act of the state legislature. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03905-02-5